Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 1 General Provisions and Definitions

§ 21-1-101.
Short title.

This act [§§

21-1-101

through

21-13-721

] shall be known and may be cited as the Wyoming Education Code of 1969.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-1.

Application. —

In a certificated guidance counselor's wrongful termination suit, summary judgment in favor of the school district was proper as the counselor was not a teacher within the meaning of the Wyoming Teacher Employment Law, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

21-1-101

to -114, and was therefore not entitled to its protections.
Luhm v. Bd. of Trs., 2009 WY 63, 206 P.3d 1290,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2009).

Cited

in

Laramie County Sch. Dist. Number One v. Muir, 808 P.2d 797,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 21-1-102.
Use of “shall” and “may”. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-2; repealed by 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 21-1-103.
“State superintendent”, “state board” defined.

As used in this act [§§

21-1-101

through

21-13-721

], unless the context otherwise requires or unless otherwise specifically noted:

“State superintendent” means the state superintendent of public instruction;

“State board” means the state board of education;

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 30 § 4.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-3; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 4, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

added (a)(iii).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

repealed former (a)(iii), which defined “Director.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

§ 21-1-104.
[Repealed.]

History.

2013 ch. 1, § 1, effective January 29, 2013; repealed by 2015 ch. 30, § 4, effective February 25, 2015.